apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aken</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ook</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ound</l>      <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>inding</l>    <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>inding</l>    <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>inding</l>    <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inds</l>      <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ound</l>      <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/ite__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itten</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>iting</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>iting</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>iting</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ites</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ble/ed__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>eding</l>     <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>eding</l>     <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>eding</l>     <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eds</l>       <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bles/s__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sed</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>sing</l>      <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>sing</l>      <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>sing</l>      <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sed</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bl/ow__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>own</l>       <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ows</l>       <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sow__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cost__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/uy__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>uying</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>uying</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>uying</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uy</l>        <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uys</l>       <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bind">            <i>b</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bite">            <i>b</i><par n="b/ite__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="buy">             <i>b</i><par n="b/uy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blow up">         <i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bleed to death">  <i>ble</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>death</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>death</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bring">           <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bring to mind">   <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>mind</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>mind</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="breed">           <i>bre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="breed maggots">   <i>bre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>maggots</l><r><g><b/>maggots</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="breed worms">     <i>bre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>worms</l><r><g><b/>worms</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="breastfeed">      <i>breastfe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="burst">           <i>burst</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cast">            <i>cast</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cost">            <i>cost</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="find">            <i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="find out">        <i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="feed">            <i>fe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feed a horse">    <i>fe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>horse</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>horse</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="feed on">         <i>fe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="flow into">       <i>fl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="grow">            <i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grow cold">       <i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cold</l><r><g><b/>cold</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="grow fierce">     <i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fierce</l><r><g><b/>fierce</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="grow scaly">      <i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>scaly</l><r><g><b/>scaly</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="grow togther">    <i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>togther</l><r><g><b/>togther</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="hurt">            <i>hurt</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hurt to look">    <i>hurt</i><par n="cost__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>look</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>look</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="interbreed">      <i>interbre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="know">            <i>kn</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overthrow">       <i>overthr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="read">            <i>read</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shake">           <i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sow">             <i>sow</i><par n="sow__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="speed">    <i>spe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strew">           <i>strew</i><par n="sow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="take advantage of"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take care">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>care</l><r><g><b/>care</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take effect">     <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>effect</l><r><g><b/>effect</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take in custody"> <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>custody</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>custody</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take">            <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>care<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>care<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take pains">      <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pains</l><r><g><b/>pains</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take place">      <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>place</l><r><g><b/>place</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take refuge">     <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>refuge</l><r><g><b/>refuge</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="throw a party">   <i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>party</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>party</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="thrust">          <i>thrust</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undertake">       <i>undert</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wind">            <i>w</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wind up">         <i>w</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
